District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-1673

Denials.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 13, 1993, D.C. Law 9-184, § 313, 39 DCR 8208
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1235, 46 DCR 3142

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-273.

Editor's Notes

Revision of chapter: See note to § 3-1641.